Utah statutes.
16-6a-106.   Forms.
(1) (a)  The division may prescribe forms or cover sheets for documents
required or permitted to be filed by this chapter.
(b)  If the division prescribes a form or cover sheet pursuant to Subsection
(1)(a), the division shall provide the form or cover sheet on request.
(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1):
(a)  the use of a form or cover sheet is not mandatory unless the division
specifically requires the use of the form or cover sheet; and
(b)  a requirement that a form or cover sheet be used may not:
(i) preclude in any way the inclusion in any document of any item that is not
prohibited to be included by this chapter; or
(ii)  require the inclusion with the filed document of any item that is not
otherwise required by this chapter.
